Louisiana, session 2026, HB871.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:1(A)(1) and (2), (C), (E)(4), (G), (H), 3, and 26 are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 34:1(B)(4), (E)(5), and (F)(4) are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§1. Continuation; qualifications; appointments; terms; vacancies
A. Membership; qualifications; vacancies.
(1) The Board of Commissioners of the Port of New Orleans, hereinafter
referred to as "the board" is continued. The number of members comprising the
board shall be seven nine, who shall be qualified voters, four of whom shall each
have his principal place of business in the parish of Orleans, two of whom shall each
have his principal place of business in the parish of Jefferson, and one of whom shall
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-965 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 871
have his principal place of business in the parish of St. Bernard, and two of whom
shall have his principal place of business in the parish of St. Tammany. The four
members from the parish of Orleans shall fill the positions on the board to be
designated as Positions D, E, F, and G; the two members from the parish of Jefferson
shall fill the positions on the board to be designated as Positions A and C; and the
member from the parish of St. Bernard shall fill the position on the board to be
designated as Position B; and the two members from the parish of St. Tammany shall
fill the positions on the board to be designated as H and I or as required by Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection.
(2) On or after October 1, 1976, vacancies occurring because of expiration
of term and the two additional memberships created by this Act* shall be filled in
such manner that the first such vacancy occurring shall be filled by a member who
shall hold Position A, and each such subsequent vacancy shall be filled in sequence
by members holding Positions B, C, D, E, F, and G, H, and I, respectively. Any
vacancy occurring prior to October 1, 1976, shall be filled in the same manner in
which the position was initially filled.
* * *
B. Nominating agencies.
* * *
(4) For the purpose of selecting nominees for the two members, each of
whom shall be appointed by the governor from the nominees selected by the St.
Tammany Parish nominating organization, the following agencies shall constitute
and shall be designated as the St. Tammany Parish nominating organization:
(a) St. Tammany Economic Development Corporation.
(b) Northshore Business Council.
(c) St. Tammany Parish Chamber of Commerce.
(d) Louisiana Farm Bureau.
(e) Port Maritime Council of Greater New Orleans and Vicinity.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-965 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 871
C. Nominating Councils; selection of nominees. Each nominating
organization shall have a nominating council on which shall be seated the presidents
or recognized heads of the nominating agencies of that nominating organization, as
enumerated in Subsections (B)(1), (2), and (3), and (4), respectively, of this Section.
Nominees to the governor for appointment to the board shall be selected by the
nominating council of the appropriate nominating organization from among those
named by the nominating agencies of said nominating organization as required by
this Section.
* * *
E. Nominees submitted by nominating organizations.
* * *
(4) Within ten days after notification of a vacancy or vacancies in Position
H or I, the first listed nominating agency of St. Tammany Parish nominating
organization shall submit in writing to the members of its nominating council the
names of two persons having the qualifications set forth in this Section as nominees
for each such vacancy or vacancies. Thereafter, the remaining nominating agencies
of that nominating organization, in the order in which they are listed in Paragraph
(B)(4) of this Section and within intervals of five days each, shall consecutively
submit in like manner, the names of two nominees for each such vacancy.
(4) (5) No person shall be eligible for nomination if he has been previously
nominated by another nominating agency. In all cases, signed copies of the
communications to the appropriate nominating council transmitting the names of the
nominees shall be sent to the governing bodies of the other nominating agencies
F. Certification to governor.
* * *
(4) As soon as the names of the nominees for Positions H and I as selected
by the appropriate nominating agencies have been received, or in any event within
ten days after the last delay for the submission of the names of nominees for
Positions H and I have expired, the St. Tammany Parish Nominating Council, at a
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-965 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 871
meeting convened on the written call of any member thereof, shall certify to the
governor for such vacancy then existing the names of three nominees from among
the nominees whose names have been submitted to it by the nominating agencies of
the St. Tammany Parish nominating organization, and from among the nominees
thus certified the governor shall make an appointment or appointments to fill such
vacancy.
G. Nominating agencies; identity. The nominating agencies listed in
Subsections (B)(1), (2), and (3), and (4) of this Section shall be understood and
construed to be the agencies presently existing and designated by the names listed
in Subsections (B)(1), (2), and (3), and (4) or their respective legal successors.
H. Dissolution of nominating agencies; effect. If any of the nominating
agencies listed in Subsections (B)(1), (2), and (3), and (4) of this Section ceases to
exist or to function, without any legal successor, the nominees to be submitted to the
appropriate nominating council as provided in Subsection E of this Section, shall be
submitted by the nominating agencies of the appropriate nominating organization
that continue to exist and function.
* * *
§3. Officers of board; meetings
The board of commissioners shall elect from its membership, a chairman, a
vice chairman and a secretary-treasurer, whose duties shall be those usual to such
officers. The board shall meet once a month in regular session. They shall meet in
special sessions as often as the chairman of the board convenes them, or on written
request of four members. Four Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business. The board shall prescribe rules to govern its
meetings, and shall keep suitable offices convenient to the business center of the city
of New Orleans.
* * *
§26. Port and harbor police
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-965 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 871
The board of commissioners may, in its discretion, appoint, fix salaries of,
and pay port and harbor police; said police to consist of such number of men of good
character and citizens of the state, not under 21 years of age. Each of the port and
harbor police so appointed shall furnish bond in a sum to be fixed by the board of
commissioners at not less than one thousand dollars, conditioned on the faithful
performance of his duties, and any person injured or damaged by any port or harbor
police may sue upon said bond. The port and harbor police shall have, under the
direction and control of the board of commissioners, the same power to make arrests,
in and upon the property within the jurisdiction of the board and approaches thereto,
and to execute and return all criminal warrants and processes, as sheriffs of this state
have, and shall under the same direction and authority, have all the powers of sheriffs
as peace officers in all places and on all premises under the jurisdiction and control
of the board, and the streets and approaches thereto. Any persons arrested by
officers of the board and the return of all warrants or processes served by said
officers shall be forthwith surrendered or delivered to the criminal sheriff of the
Parish of Orleans or sheriffs of St. Bernard, and Jefferson, and St. Tammany
parishes; provided this shall in no way deprive the New Orleans city police or any
sheriff or deputy sheriff in the parishes of Orleans, St. Bernard, or Jefferson, or St.
Tammany from making arrests or from serving warrants or process of court in any
such place or on any such premises. The board of commissioners shall make rules
and regulations for the conduct, management and control of the port and harbor
police, and shall, from time to time, enlarge, modify or change such rules and
regulations in its discretion.